Nebraska, session 109, LB928.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB928 LB928
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 43-1311, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-1311 Except as otherwise provided in the Nebraska Indian Child
Welfare Act, immediately following removal of a child from his or her
home pursuant to section 43-284, the person or court in charge of the
child shall:
(1) Conduct or cause to be conducted an investigation of the child's
circumstances designed to establish a safe and appropriate plan for the
rehabilitation of the foster child and family unit or permanent placement
of the child;
(2) Require that the child receive a medical examination within two
weeks of his or her removal from his or her home;
(3) Subject the child to such further diagnosis and evaluation as is
necessary;
(4) Require that the child attend the same school as prior to the
foster care placement unless the person or court in charge determines
that attending such school would not be in the best interests of the
child; and
(5) Notify the Department of Health and Human Services to identify,
locate, and provide written notification to adult relatives and fictive
kin of the child as provided in section 43-1311.01.
Sec. 2. Section 43-1311.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-1311.01 (1) When notified pursuant to section 43-1311 or upon
voluntary placement of a child, the Department of Health and Human
Services shall, as provided in this section, identify, locate, and
provide written notification of the removal of the child from his or her
home, within thirty days after removal, to any noncustodial parent and to
all grandparents, all parents who have legal custody of a sibling of the
child, and all adult siblings, adult aunts, adult uncles, adult cousins,
and adult relatives, and fictive kin of the child suggested by the child,
-2-

LB928 LB928
2026 2026
or the child's parents, or relatives of the child except when that
relative's history of family or domestic violence makes notification
inappropriate. For purposes of this section, sibling means an individual
who is considered by Nebraska law to be a sibling or who would have been
considered a sibling under Nebraska law but for a termination of parental
rights or other disruption in parental rights such as the death of a
parent. If the child is an Indian child as defined in section 43-1503,
the child's extended family members as defined in such section shall be
notified. Such notification shall include all of the following
information:
(a) The child has been or is being removed from the custody of the
parent or parents of the child;
(b) An explanation of the options the relative or fictive kin has
under federal, state, and local law to participate in the care and
placement of the child, including any options that may be lost by failing
to respond to the notice;
(c) A description of the requirements for the relative or fictive
kin to serve as a foster care provider or other type of care provider for
the child and the additional services, training, and other support
available for children receiving such care; and
(d) Information concerning the option to apply for guardianship
assistance payments.
(2) The department shall investigate the names and locations of the
relatives and fictive kin, including, but not limited to, asking the
child in an age-appropriate manner about relatives and fictive kin
important to the child and obtaining information regarding the location
of the relatives and fictive kin.
(3) The department shall provide to the court, within thirty
calendar days after removal of the child, the names and relationship to
the child of all relatives and fictive kin contacted, the method of
contact, and the responses received from the relatives and fictive kin.
-3-

LB928 LB928
2026 2026
(4) For purposes of this section:
(a) Indian child has the same meaning as in section 43-1503;
(b) Fictive kin has the same meaning as in section 71-1901; and
(c) Sibling means an individual who is considered by Nebraska law to
be a sibling or who would have been considered a sibling under Nebraska
law but for a termination of parental rights or other disruption in
parental rights such as the death of a parent.
Sec. 3. Section 71-1901, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-1901 For purposes of sections 71-1901 to 71-1906.01:
(1) Person includes a partnership, limited liability company, firm,
agency, association, or corporation;
(1) (2) Child means an unemancipated minor;
(2) (3) Child-placing agency has the definition found in section
71-1926;
(3) (4) Department means the Department of Health and Human
Services;
(4) Fictive kin means an adult who is not related to a child by
blood, marriage, or adoption, but who:
(a) Has previously lived with the child; or
(b) Is a trusted adult that has a preexisting, significant
relationship with the child;
(5) Foster care means engaged in the service of exercising twenty-
four-hour daily care, supervision, custody, or control over children, for
compensation or hire, in lieu of the care or supervision normally
exercised by parents in their own home. Foster care does not include
casual care at irregular intervals or programs as defined in section
71-1910;
(6) Foster family home means a home which provides foster care to a
child or children pursuant to a foster care placement as defined in
section 43-1301. Foster family homes include licensed homes where the
-4-

LB928 LB928
2026 2026
primary caretaker has no significant prior relationship with the child or
children in his or her care and both licensed and unlicensed relative and
kinship homes;
(7) Kinship home means a home where a child or children receive
foster care and at least one of the primary caretakers is fictive kin of
has previously lived with or is a trusted adult that has a preexisting,
significant relationship with the child or children or a sibling of such
child or children pursuant to section 43-1311.02;
(8) Native American means a person who is a member of an Indian
tribe or eligible for membership in an Indian tribe;
(9) Person includes a partnership, limited liability company, firm,
agency, association, or corporation;
(10) (9) Relative home means a home where a child or children
receive foster care and at least one of the primary caretakers is related
to the child or children, or to a sibling of such child or children
pursuant to section 43-1311.02, in his or her care by blood, marriage, or
adoption or, in the case of an Indian child, at least one of the primary
caretakers is an extended family member as defined in section 43-1503;
and
(11) (10) Residential child-caring agency has the definition found
in section 71-1926.
Sec. 4. Original sections 43-1311, 43-1311.01, and 71-1901, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-5-